Massachusetts, session 194th, S2612.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Chapter 25 of the General Laws is hereby amended by adding the following 
section:- 
Section 24. (a) Not less than annually, the department shall publish a report of the 
information collected pursuant to section 42A of chapter 40, section 58A of chapter 164, section 
124F of said chapter 164 and section 11F of chapter 165. The department shall make the report 
publicly available on its website. 
(b) Annually, the department shall conduct a public information campaign to inform 
customers of shut-off protections for financial hardship during the summer months and available 
payment assistance programs. The department shall develop: (i) accessible, multi-lingual and 
easily comprehensible web-based educational materials; and (ii) a robust virtual and in-person 
statewide outreach program to educate low and moderate income communities on the protections 
available to them under section 42A of chapter 40, section 58A of chapter 164, section 124F of 

of 5 13 said chapter 164 and section 11F of chapter 165. Annually, the department shall collect and 
report data on its outreach efforts including: (1) outlets used to disseminate the required 
information; (2) the location, dates and number of attendees at in-person outreach events; (3) the 
languages used in written outreach materials; and (4) the amount of people who registered for 
arrearage management plans following the public outreach program. The department shall make 
these reports available to the public on its website. 
SECTION 2. Section 42A of chapter 40 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 
Official Edition, is hereby amended by adding the following paragraph:- 
No city, town or water district shall, between May fifteenth and September thirtieth or 
during a period in which the National Weather Service has issued an excessive heat warning or 
advisory, refuse to restore or intentionally shut off the water service to any resident who cannot 
pay an overdue charge because of financial hardship. Cities, towns and water districts shall 
provide monthly reports to the department of public utilities of the following information: (i) the 
number of households that would have otherwise lost water service if this paragraph did not 
apply; (ii) the municipalities and zip codes of households that would have lost service; and (iii) 
the estimated cost to the service provider of providing service that would have otherwise ceased. 
The department of public utilities shall promulgate regulations, pursuant to chapter 30A, that 
establish daily fines for any city, town or water district that violates this section, and may 
promulgate other rules and regulations consistent with this section, pursuant to said chapter 30A, 
as it deems reasonable and necessary to implement this section. 
SECTION 3. Section 58A of chapter 164 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby 
amended by adding the following paragraph:- 

of 5 35  No municipal lighting plant shall, between May fifteenth and September thirtieth or 
during a period in which the National Weather Service has issued an excessive heat warning or 
advisory, refuse to restore or intentionally shut off the electricity supply service to any customer 
who cannot pay an overdue charge because of financial hardship, when such electric service is 
used to provide temperature control, or otherwise protect residents and their property from 
weather or climate conditions. Cities, towns and water districts shall provide monthly reports to 
the department of public utilities of the following information: (i) the number of households that 
would have otherwise lost electric service if this paragraph did not apply; (ii) the municipalities 
and zip codes of households that would have lost service; and (iii) the estimated cost to the 
service provider of providing service that would have otherwise ceased. The department shall 
promulgate regulations, pursuant to chapter 30A, that establish daily fines for any municipal 
light plant that violates this section. The department may promulgate other rules and regulations 
consistent with this section, pursuant to said chapter 30A, as it deems reasonable and necessary 
to implement this section. 
SECTION 4. Section 124F of said chapter 164, as so appearing, is hereby amended by 
striking out the last sentence. 
SECTION 5. Said section 124F of said chapter 164, as so appearing, is hereby further 
amended by adding the following 3 paragraphs:- 
No electric company shall, between May fifteenth and September thirtieth or during a 
period in which the National Weather Service has issued an excessive heat warning or advisory, 
refuse to restore or shut off electric service to any residential customer who cannot pay an 
overdue charge because of financial hardship, when such electric service is used to provide 

of 5 57 temperature control, or otherwise protect residents and their property from weather or climate 
conditions.  
Electric companies shall provide monthly reports to the department of public utilities of 
the following information: (i) the number of households that would have otherwise lost electric 
service if this paragraph did not apply; (ii) the municipalities and zip codes of households that 
would have lost service; and (iii) the estimated cost to the service provider of providing service 
that would have otherwise ceased. 
The department shall promulgate regulations, pursuant to chapter 30A, that establish 
daily fines for any electric company that violates this section. The department may promulgate 
other rules and regulations consistent with this section, pursuant to said chapter 30A, as it deems 
reasonable and necessary to implement this section. 
SECTION 6. Chapter 165 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after 
section 11E the following section:- 
Section 11F. (a) No corporation or company shall, between May fifteenth and September 
thirtieth or during a period in which the National Weather Service has issued an excessive heat 
warning or advisory, refuse to restore or intentionally shut off the water service to any residential 
customer who cannot pay an overdue charge because of financial hardship.  
(b) Corporations and companies shall provide monthly reports to the department of public 
utilities of the following information: (i) the number of households that would have otherwise 
lost water service if this paragraph did not apply; (ii) the municipalities and zip codes of 
households that would have lost service; and (iii) the estimated cost to the service provider of 
providing service that would have otherwise ceased. 

of 5 79  (c) The department shall promulgate regulations, pursuant to chapter 30A, that establish 
daily fines for any company violating this section. The department may promulgate other rules 
and regulations consistent with this section, pursuant to said chapter 30A, as it deems reasonable 
and necessary to implement this section.